District of Columbia statutes.
16-1702

Recovery of losses at gaming.

A person who, at any time or sitting, by playing at cards, dice or any other game, or by betting on the sides or hands of persons who play, loses to a person so playing or betting, a sum of money, or other valuable thing, amounting to $25 or more, and pays or delivers the money or thing, or any part thereof, may, within three months after the payment or delivery, sue for and recover the money, goods or other valuable thing, so lost and paid or delivered, or any part thereof, or the full value thereof, by a civil action, from the winner thereof, with costs. If the person who loses the money or other thing, does not, within three months actually and bona fide, and without collusion, sue, and with effect prosecute, therefor, any person may sue for, and recover treble the value of the money, goods, chattels, and other things, with costs of suit, by a civil action against the winner, one-half to the use of the plaintiff, the remainder to the use of the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 582, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-1703 and § 16-1704.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1702.
1973 Ed., § 16-1702.